Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5101.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 128.4
EMERGENCY SHELTERS
42-128.4-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the term:
(1) "Emergency shelter" means a facility with overnight sleeping accommodations, the
primary purpose of which is to provide temporary shelter for the homeless in general or for specific
populations of the homeless.
(2) "Housing resources commission" or "commission" means the Rhode Island housing
resources commission established pursuant to § 42-128-4.
(3) "Licensing agency" means the secretary of housing established pursuant to § 42-64.19-
3(a)(4), or designee.
42-128.4-2. Licensing and exemption.
(a) The housing resources commission shall establish an application for an emergency
shelter license no later than January 1, 2026. Upon receipt of an application for a license, the
licensing agency shall issue a license if the applicant meets the requirements established pursuant
to this chapter. A license issued under the provisions of this section shall be the property of the
state and loaned to the licensee, and it shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed

premises. Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application,
and shall not be transferable or assignable except with the written approval of the commission. No
fee shall be charged for the license.
(b) Any emergency shelter established due to a natural disaster, impending dangerous
storm, or other event, including, but not limited to, fires, hurricanes or blizzards, shall be exempt
from this chapter.
42-128.4-3. Minimum shelter standards.
(a) All emergency shelters that are required to be licensed shall:
(1) Provide a safe place for a person to temporarily reside. Safety of residents and staff
shall be the shelters’ top priority;
(2) Make drinking water available to residents and proper bathroom facilities as required
by the state building code in chapter 27.3 of title 23;
(3) Develop a written policy regarding the privacy and confidentiality of its residents as
required by state and federal law; and
(4) Establish an approved procedure for the safe transfer of a person seeking shelter or
having been sheltered at the licensed premises, who can no longer reside in the shelter at the
licensed premises in question. The established procedure shall be posted in a conspicuous place on
the licensed premises that is in an area accessed frequently by residents.
(b) The housing resources commission shall promulgate additional minimum shelter
standards that shall apply to emergency shelters that are at least partially funded by the state, no
later than December 1, 2026.
42-128.4-4. Grievance procedure.
The housing resource commission shall promulgate a grievance procedure designed to
address complaints of persons who have resided or attempted to reside in any emergency shelter
within this state. Grievance procedures shall be posted in the licensed premises in a conspicuous
place accessed frequently by residents.
42-128.4-5. Fees prohibited.
Any fees or payments of money for the purposes of providing shelter and personal care
items, including, but not limited to, linens, toiletries and diapers shall be prohibited unless
otherwise allowable by state or federal law. Resident funds provided to a shelter for the purposes
of teaching financial literacy or creating a "savings account" are permitted if the funds are returned
to the resident at the appropriate time or upon request.
LC000110 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000110
========
LC000110 - Page 3 of 4